Maryland, session 2026, HB0200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–810.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FEMA ELEVATION CERTIFICATE” MEANS THE CERTIFICATE
ISSUED BY THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY THAT CERTIFIES
OFFICIAL ELEVATION AND BUILDING DATA FOR A PROPERTY LOCATED WITHIN A
SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA IN ORDER TO INFORM FLOOD INSURANCE PREMIUMS.
(3) “MODERATE–RISK FLOOD HAZARD AREA” MEANS AN AREA THAT
IS:
– 1 –

Ch. 776 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) IDENTIFIED BY THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
AGENCY AS HAVING A 0.2% CHANCE OF ANNUAL FLOODING; AND
(II) COMMONLY KNOWN AS THE 500–YEAR FLOODPLAIN.
(4) “SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA” MEANS AN AREA THAT IS:
(I) IDENTIFIED BY THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
AGENCY AS HAVING A 1% CHANCE OF ANNUAL FLOODING; AND
(II) COMMONLY KNOWN AS THE 100–YEAR FLOODPLAIN.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP, PUBLISH, AND MAINTAIN A
REAL PROPERTY FLOOD RISK DISCLOSURE STATEMENT FORM FOR USE IN
CONNECTION WITH A SALE OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY AS PROVIDED IN §
10–716 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) THE FLOOD RISK DISCLOSURE STATEMENT FORM SHALL, AT
MINIMUM, INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED WHOLLY OR PARTLY
WITHIN A SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA;
(II) WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED WHOLLY OR PARTLY
WITHIN A MODERATE–RISK FLOOD HAZARD AREA;
(III) WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO A REQUIREMENT
UNDER FEDERAL LAW THAT REQUIRES THE OWNER TO OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN
FLOOD INSURANCE;
(IV) WHETHER THE VENDOR HAS KNOWLEDGE OF ANY PAST
OCCURRENCE WHERE AN OWNER RECEIVED AID FOR FLOOD DAMAGE ON THE
PROPERTY FROM THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY, THE U.S.
SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION, OR OTHER FEDERAL DISASTER ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM;
(V) WHETHER THE VENDOR CURRENTLY HAS FLOOD
INSURANCE FOR THE PROPERTY;
(VI) WHETHER THERE IS A FEMA ELEVATION CERTIFICATE
AVAILABLE FOR THE PROPERTY;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 776
(VII) WHETHER THE VENDOR HAS KNOWLEDGE OF ANY CLAIMS
FILED FOR FLOOD DAMAGE TO THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING WITH THE NATIONAL
FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM; AND
(VIII) WHETHER THE VENDOR HAS KNOWLEDGE THAT THE
PROPERTY EXPERIENCES, OR HAS EXPERIENCED, ANY FLOOD DAMAGE, WATER
SEEPAGE, OR POOLED WATER DUE TO A NATURAL FLOODING EVENT, INCLUDING
FLOODING CAUSED BY HEAVY RAINFALL, A COASTAL STORM SURGE, TIDAL
INUNDATION, OR RIVER OVERFLOWS.
Article – Real Property
10–716.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FEMA ELEVATION CERTIFICATE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–810 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
IMPROVED BY FOUR OR FEWER SINGLE FAMILY UNITS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) THE INITIAL SALE OF A SINGLE FAMILY RESIDENCE THAT:
1. HAS NEVER BEEN OCCUPIED; OR
2. A CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY HAS BEEN ISSUED
FOR WITHIN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE VENDOR AND PURCHASER
ENTER INTO A CONTRACT OF SALE;
(II) A TRANSFER OF PROPERTY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE
TRANSFER TAX UNDER § 13–207 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE, EXCEPT:
1. A LAND INSTALLMENT CONTRACT OF SALE; OR
2. AN OPTION TO PURCHASE REAL PROPERTY;
(III) A SALE BY A LENDER, OR AN AFFILIATE OF A LENDER, THAT
ACQUIRED THE REAL PROPERTY BY FORECLOSURE OR DEED IN LIEU OF
FORECLOSURE;
(IV) A SHERIFF’S SALE, TAX SALE, OR SALE BY FORECLOSURE,
PARTITION, OR COURT–APPOINTED TRUSTEE;
– 3 –

Ch. 776 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) A TRANSFER BY A FIDUCIARY IN THE COURSE OF
ADMINISTERING A DECEDENT’S ESTATE, GUARDIANSHIP, CONSERVATORSHIP, OR
TRUST;
(VI) A TRANSFER OF A SINGLE FAMILY RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY THAT THE BUYER WILL CONVERT INTO A USE OTHER THAN RESIDENTIAL;
OR
(VII) A SALE OF UNIMPROVED REAL PROPERTY.
(B) (C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, BEFORE ENTERING INTO A CONTRACT
OF SALE, A VENDOR OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE
PURCHASER:
(1) A COMPLETED FLOOD RISK DISCLOSURE STATEMENT FORM
DEVELOPED AND PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT UNDER
§ 5–810 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) IF APPLICABLE:
(I) A AVAILABLE, A COPY OF THE FEMA ELEVATION
CERTIFICATE FOR THE PROPERTY;
(II) AN ACCOUNTING OF ANY MONEY RECEIVED FROM CLAIMS
FILED FOR FLOOD DAMAGE TO THE PROPERTY; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF TIMES FLOODING EVENTS HAVE
OCCURRED ON THE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June 1, 2027,
the Department of the Environment shall publish the flood risk disclosure statement form
required under § 5–810 of the Environment Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –